South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1020.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) Notwithstanding another provision of law, the election of members of the boards of trustees for Lexington County School Districts 1, 2, and 4, must be by partisan election beginning in 2028. Successors to members of the boards whose terms expire in 2028 and thereafter shall be elected on a partisan basis as provided herein for terms of four years each. Beginning in 2028, candidates may be nominated for office in the manner provided by law, and candidates must be elected in the primary election and the general election, respectively, according to the provisions of Title 7 of the S.C. Code, mutatis mutandis. (B) All other provisions of law relating to the election of these school trustees, including areas from which members must be elected by the qualified electors of the county, shall continue to apply except for provisions of law relating to the nonpartisan election of such trustees. Present members of the boards elected on a nonpartisan basis whose terms expire after 2028 shall continue to serve in office but shall declare their political affiliation by affidavit filed with the Lexington County Board of Voter Registration and Elections. Nothing herein prevents a current trustee elected on a nonpartisan basis from offering and being elected as a partisan candidate. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----